District of Columbia statutes.
46-357.03

Relationship of Office of the Attorney General to United States central authority.

The Office of the Attorney General is recognized as the agency designated by the United States central authority to perform specific functions under the Convention.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 703, 63 DCR 222